Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-8,192
Board; roster; copies; fee.

The board shall maintain and make available to the public a complete roster of each professional landscape architect that includes the name and last-known address of each professional landscape architect. The board may cause to be delivered a copy of such complete roster to any person upon request. The board may charge a fee in accordance with sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 to the requester of such a copy.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 9, p. 1862;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 31;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB30, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB696, § 2.